Nevada, session 83, AB13.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 176.275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176.275 1. A judgment which imposes a fine or
administrative assessment or requires a defendant to pay restitution
or repay the expenses of a defense constitutes a lien in like manner
as a judgment for money rendered in a civil action.
2. Independent actions may be commenced to enforce the
provisions of a judgment which:
(a) Impose a fine, fee, cost or assessment; or
(b) Require a defendant to pay restitution.
3. A judgment which requires a defendant to pay restitution:
(a) May be recorded, docketed and enforced as any other
judgment for money rendered in a civil action.
(b) Does not expire until the judgment is satisfied.
[3.] 4. An independent action to enforce a judgment which
requires a defendant to pay restitution may be commenced at any
time.
Sec. 2. NRS 176A.850 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176A.850 1. A person who:
(a) Has fulfilled the conditions of probation for the entire period
thereof;
(b) Is recommended for earlier discharge by the Division; or
(c) Has demonstrated fitness for honorable discharge but
because of economic hardship, verified by the Division, has been
unable to make restitution as ordered by the court,
 may be granted an honorable discharge from probation by order
of the court.
2. [A] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a person
whose term of probation has expired and:
(a) Whose whereabouts are unknown;
-
*AB13*

– 3 –
(b) Who has failed to make restitution in full as ordered by the
court, without a verified showing of economic hardship; or
(c) Who has otherwise failed to qualify for an honorable
discharge as provided in subsection 1,
 is not eligible for an honorable discharge and must be given a
dishonorable discharge.
3. The court may, at its discretion, grant a person whose term
of probation has expired and who is not eligible for an honorable
discharge a general discharge if the court determines, based upon
the nature and extent of compliance of the person with the
conditions of probation, that a general discharge is appropriate.
4. A dishonorable discharge or general discharge releases the
person from any further obligation, except as otherwise provided in
subsection [3.
3.] 5.
5. Any unpaid fine, fee, cost or assessment and any amount of
restitution remaining unpaid on the date of discharge constitutes a
civil liability [arising] that:
(a) Arises upon the date of discharge ; and [is]
(b) Is enforceable pursuant to NRS 176.275 [.] on the basis of
the judgment which imposes the fine, fee, cost or assessment or
requires the payment of restitution.
[4.] 6. A person who has been discharged from probation:
(a) Is free from the terms and conditions of probation.
(b) Is immediately restored to the right to serve as a juror in a
civil action.
(c) Four years after the date of discharge from probation, is
restored to the right to hold office.
(d) Six years after the date of discharge from probation, is
restored to the right to serve as a juror in a criminal action.
(e) If the person meets the requirements of NRS 179.245, may
apply to the court for the sealing of records relating to the
conviction.
(f) Must be informed of the provisions of this section and NRS
179.245 in the person’s probation papers.
(g) Is exempt from the requirements of chapter 179C of NRS,
but is not exempt from the requirements of chapter 179D of NRS.
(h) Shall disclose the conviction to a gaming establishment and
to the State and its agencies, departments, boards, commissions and
political subdivisions, if required in an application for employment,
license or other permit. As used in this paragraph, “establishment”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 463.0148.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (h), need not
disclose the conviction to an employer or prospective employer.
-
*AB13*

– 4 –
[5.] 7. The prior conviction of a person who has been
discharged from probation may be used for purposes of
impeachment. In any subsequent prosecution of the person, the prior
conviction may be pleaded and proved if otherwise admissible.
[6.] 8. Upon discharge from probation, the person so
discharged must be given an official document which provides:
(a) That the person has received an honorable discharge ,
general discharge or dishonorable discharge, as applicable, from
probation;
(b) That the person is restored to his or her civil right to serve as
a juror in a civil action as of the date of his or her discharge from
probation;
(c) The date on which the person’s civil right to hold office will
be restored pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection [4;] 6; and
(d) The date on which the person’s civil right to serve as a juror
in a criminal action will be restored pursuant to paragraph (d) of
subsection [4.
7.] 6.
9. A person who has been discharged from probation in this
State or elsewhere and whose official documentation of discharge
from probation is lost, damaged or destroyed may file a written
request with a court of competent jurisdiction to restore the person’s
civil rights pursuant to this section. Upon verification that the person
has been discharged from probation and is eligible to be restored to
the civil rights set forth in subsection [4,] 6, the court shall issue an
order restoring the person to the civil rights set forth in subsection
[4.] 6. A person must not be required to pay a fee to receive such an
order.
[8.] 10. A person who has been discharged from probation in
this State or elsewhere may present:
(a) Official documentation of discharge from probation, if it
contains the provisions set forth in subsection [6;] 8; or
(b) A court order restoring the person’s civil rights,
 as proof that the person has been restored to the civil rights set
forth in subsection [4.] 6.
Sec. 3. NRS 179.2445 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.2445 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
upon the filing of a petition for the sealing of records pursuant to
NRS 179.245, 179.247, 179.255, 179.259 or 179.2595, there is a
rebuttable presumption that the records should be sealed if the
applicant satisfies all statutory requirements for the sealing of the
records.
2. The presumption set forth in subsection 1 [does] :
(a) Applies at the discretion of the court to a defendant
who is given a general discharge from probation pursuant to
-
*AB13*

– 5 –
NRS 176A.850 and applies to the court for the sealing of records
relating to the conviction.
(b) Does not apply to a defendant who is given a dishonorable
discharge from probation pursuant to NRS 176A.850 and applies to
the court for the sealing of records relating to the conviction.
Sec. 4. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to any
judgment which imposes a fine, fee, cost or assessment or requires a
defendant to pay restitution which is rendered before, on or after
July 1, 2025.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB13*